Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,142.05
Incorporated municipality; sales and use tax; previously authorized; continuation without election.

Any incorporated municipality which had, prior to January 1, 1978, authorized a sales and use tax pursuant to section 77-27,142 may continue the tax without submitting the question of continuing such tax to a vote of the qualified electors.

Laws 1978, LB 394, § 6.